Montana, session 2025, HB780.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Public hearing on statewide ballot issue proposals. (1) After
transmitting a proposed statutory initiative, statutory referendum, constitutional initiative, or constitutional
convention initiative and the proposal's ballot statements to the legislative services division as provided in 13-
27-216(1), 13-27-217(1), 13-27-218(1), or 13-27-219(1), the secretary of state shall conduct a public hearing at
which public comments and testimony must be received.
(2) The public hearing must be held within the same period as the review of the proposed ballot
issue and ballot statements by the legislative services division provided in 13-27-216(2), 13-27-217(2), 13-27-
218(2), and 13-27-219(2).

Section 2. Section 13-27-216, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-27-216. Statutory initiative process and procedure. (1) (a) A proponent of a statutory initiative
shall submit the text of the proposed statutory initiative to the secretary of state together with draft ballot
statements and the filing fee required by 13-27-215. The secretary of state shall, without undue delay, forward a
copy of the text of the proposed statutory initiative and ballot statements to the legislative services division for
review in accordance with 13-27-225.
(b) A proposed statutory initiative may not be accepted by the secretary of state until 10 days after
the adjournment sine die of the regular legislative session preceding the general election during which the
proposal is intended to be voted on. The prohibitions on acceptance of a proposed statutory initiative provided
in this subsection (1)(b) do not apply to a submission received on or after the date that falls 130 days after the
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 780

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 780.1
date that the legislature convened in regular session pursuant to 5-2-103, even if the legislature has not
adjourned sine die. If the secretary of state rejects a proposed statutory initiative pursuant to this subsection
(1)(b), the secretary of state shall promptly notify the person who submitted the proposal of the reason for the
rejection.
(2) (a) Within 14 days after receiving the proposed statutory initiative from the secretary of state,
the legislative services division shall respond in writing to the proponent in accordance with 13-27-225.
(b) During the 14-day review period by the legislative services division, the secretary of state shall
hold a public hearing in accordance with [section 1].
(3) After the proponent responds to the legislative services division as provided in 13-27-225, the
proponent shall submit the final text of the proposed statutory initiative and ballot statements to the secretary of
state. However, if a response to the legislative services division is not required by the proponent pursuant to 13-
27-225, the proponent shall instead submit the final text of the proposed statutory initiative and ballot
statements to the secretary of state after the proponent receives the legislative services division's response.
(4) On receipt of the final text of the proposed statutory initiative and the ballot statements, the
secretary of state shall reject the proposed statutory initiative if the text or a ballot statement contains material
not submitted to the legislative services division that is a substantive change not recommended by the
legislative services division. Otherwise, the secretary of state shall, without undue delay, refer a copy of the
proposed statutory initiative and ballot statements concurrently to the budget director and to the attorney
general for the attorney general's review in accordance with 13-27-226.
(5) The budget director shall determine whether a fiscal note is necessary. If the budget director
determines a fiscal note is necessary, the budget director shall prepare a fiscal note, notify the attorney general
of the necessity of the fiscal note, and provide a copy of the fiscal note pursuant to 13-27-227 within 10 days.
Receipt of the notice from the budget director begins the time frame timeframe in subsection (7).
(6) In addition to the requirements of 13-27-226, the attorney general shall:
(a) include in the attorney general's legal sufficiency review whether the proposed statutory
initiative constitutes an appropriation as set forth in 13-27-239; and
(b) review the proposed statutory initiative as to whether the proposal could cause a regulatory
taking under Montana law or otherwise will likely cause significant material harm to one or more business
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 780

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 780.1
interests in the state if approved by the voters. If the attorney general determines the proposed statutory
initiative will likely cause significant material harm to one or more business interests in the state, the attorney
general shall notify the secretary of state, which must include the finding set forth in 13-27-238(2) on the final
form of the petition.
(7) Within 30 days of receipt of the proposed statutory initiative from the secretary of state, the
attorney general shall complete the requirements set forth in 13-27-226 and subsection (6) of this section.
(8) The secretary of state shall review the legal sufficiency opinion received pursuant to 13-27-226.
(a) If the attorney general finds that the proposed statutory initiative is not legally sufficient, the
secretary of state shall, without undue delay, send written notice to the person who submitted the proposal that
the proposed statutory initiative has been rejected. The notice must include a copy of the attorney general's
legal sufficiency opinion.
(b) If the attorney general finds that the proposed statutory initiative is legally sufficient, the
secretary of state shall, without undue delay, provide the executive director of the legislative services division a
copy of the final text of the proposed statutory initiative and ballot statements in accordance with 13-27-228.
After the executive director of the legislative services division provides the secretary of state the outcome of the
vote as required by 13-27-228, the secretary of state shall immediately send a sample petition form as provided
in 13-27-233 to the person submitting the proposed statutory initiative."

Section 3. Section 13-27-217, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-27-217. Statutory referendum process and procedure. (1) (a) A proponent of a statutory
referendum shall submit the text of the proposed statutory referendum to the secretary of state together with
draft ballot statements and the filing fee required by 13-27-215. The secretary of state shall forward a copy of
the text of the proposed statutory referendum and ballot statements to the legislative services division for
review in accordance with 13-27-225.
(b) A proposed statutory referendum may not be accepted by the secretary of state until 10 days
after the adjournment sine die of the regular legislative session preceding the general election during which the
proposal is intended to be voted on. The prohibitions on acceptance of a proposed statutory referendum
provided in this subsection (1)(b) do not apply to a submission received on or after the date that falls 130 days
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 780

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 780.1
after the date that the legislature convened in regular session pursuant to 5-2-103, even if the legislature has
not adjourned sine die. If the secretary of state rejects a proposed statutory referendum pursuant to this
subsection (1)(b), the secretary of state shall promptly notify the person who submitted the proposal of the
reason for the rejection.
(2) (a) Within 7 days after receiving the proposed statutory referendum from the secretary of state,
the legislative services division shall respond in writing to the proponent in accordance with 13-27-225.
(b) During the 7-day review period by the legislative services division, the secretary of state shall
hold a public hearing in accordance with [section 1].
(3) After the proponent responds to the legislative services division as provided in 13-27-225, the
proponent shall submit the final text of the proposed statutory referendum and ballot statements to the
secretary of state. However, if a response to the legislative services division is not required by the proponent
pursuant to 13-27-225, the proponent shall instead submit the final text of the proposed statutory referendum
and ballot statements to the secretary of state after the proponent receives the legislative services division's
response.
(4) On receipt of the final text of the proposed statutory referendum and the ballot statements, the
secretary of state shall reject the proposed statutory referendum if the text or a ballot statement contains
material not submitted to the legislative services division that is a substantive change not recommended by the
legislative services division. Otherwise, the secretary of state shall refer a copy of the proposed statutory
referendum and ballot statements concurrently to the budget director and the attorney general.
(5) (a) The budget director shall determine whether a fiscal note is necessary, prepare the fiscal
note, notify the attorney general of the necessity of its determination, and provide a copy of the fiscal note, if
required, pursuant to 13-27-227 within the timeframe required in subsection (5)(b). Receipt of the notice from
the budget director begins the time frame timeframe in subsection (6) for the attorney general's review in
accordance with 13-27-226.
(b) If the legislative act that is the subject of the proposed statutory referendum had a fiscal note
prepared pursuant to 5-4-202 during the legislative session in which the bill was proposed, the budget director
shall return the fiscal note to the attorney general within 3 days. If the legislative act that is the subject of the
proposed statutory referendum did not have a fiscal note prepared pursuant to 5-4-202 during the legislative
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 780

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 780.1
session in which the bill was proposed, the budget director shall return the fiscal note to the attorney general
within 6 days.
(6) If the budget director is allowed 3 days to return the fiscal note pursuant to subsection (5), the
attorney general shall complete the requirements set forth in 13-27-226 within 14 days of the receipt of the
proposed statutory referendum from the secretary of state. However, if the budget director is allowed 6 days to
return the fiscal note pursuant to subsection (5), the attorney general shall complete the requirements set forth
in 13-27-226 within 17 days of the receipt of the proposed statutory referendum from the secretary of state.
(7) The secretary of state shall review the legal sufficiency opinion received pursuant to 13-27-226.
If the attorney general:
(a) finds that the proposed statutory referendum is not legally sufficient, the secretary of state shall,
without undue delay, send written notice to the person who submitted the proposal that the proposed statutory
referendum has been rejected. The notice must include a copy of the attorney general's legal sufficiency
opinion.
(b) finds that the proposed statutory referendum is legally sufficient, the secretary of state shall
immediately send a sample petition form as provided in 13-27-233 to the person submitting the proposed
statutory referendum."

Section 4. Section 13-27-218, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-27-218. Constitutional initiative process and procedure. (1) A proponent of a constitutional
initiative shall submit the text of the proposed constitutional initiative to the secretary of state together with draft
ballot statements and the filing fee required by 13-27-215. The secretary of state shall, without undue delay,
forward a copy of the text of the proposed constitutional initiative and ballot statements to the legislative
services division for review in accordance with 13-27-225.
(2) (a) Within 14 days after receiving the proposed constitutional initiative from the secretary of
state, the legislative services division shall respond in writing to the proponent in accordance with 13-27-225.
(b) During the 14-day review period by the legislative services division, the secretary of state shall
hold a public hearing in accordance with [section 1].
(3) After the proponent responds to the legislative services division as provided in 13-27-225, the
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 780

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 780.1
proponent shall submit the final text of the proposed constitutional initiative and ballot statements to the
secretary of state. However, if a response to the legislative services division is not required by the proponent
pursuant to 13-27-225, the proponent shall instead submit the final text of the proposed constitutional initiative
and ballot statements to the secretary of state after the proponent receives the legislative services division's
response.
(4) On receipt of the final text of the proposed constitutional initiative and the ballot statements, the
secretary of state shall reject the proposed constitutional initiative if the text or a ballot statement contains
material not submitted to the legislative services division that is a substantive change not recommended by the
legislative services division. Otherwise, the secretary of state shall, without undue delay, refer a copy of the
proposed constitutional initiative and ballot statements concurrently to the budget director and to the attorney
general.
(5) The budget director shall determine whether a fiscal note is necessary, prepare the fiscal note,
notify the attorney general of the necessity of the fiscal note, and provide a copy of the fiscal note pursuant to
13-27-227 within 10 days. Receipt of the notice from the budget director begins the timeframe in subsection (7)
for the attorney general's review in accordance with 13-27-226.
(6) In addition to the requirements in 13-27-226, the attorney general shall review the proposed
constitutional initiative as to whether the proposal could cause a regulatory taking under Montana law or
otherwise will likely cause significant material harm to one or more business interests in the state if approved by
the voters. If the attorney general determines the proposed constitutional initiative will likely cause significant
material harm to one or more business interests in the state, the attorney general shall notify the secretary of
state, which must include the finding set forth in 13-27-241 on the final form of the petition.
(7) Within 30 days of receipt of the fiscal note determination from the budget director, the attorney
general shall complete the requirements set forth in 13-27-226 and subsection (6) of this section.
(8) The secretary of state shall review the legal sufficiency opinion received pursuant to 13-27-226.
If the attorney general:
(a) finds that the proposed constitutional initiative is not legally sufficient, the secretary of state
shall, without undue delay, send written notice to the person who submitted the proposal that the proposed
constitutional initiative has been rejected. The notice must include a copy of the attorney general's legal
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 780

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 780.1
sufficiency opinion.
(b) finds that the proposed constitutional initiative is legally sufficient, the secretary of state shall,
without undue delay, provide the executive director of the legislative services division a copy of the final text of
the proposed constitutional initiative and ballot statements in accordance with 13-27-228. After the executive
director of the legislative services division provides the secretary of state the outcome of the vote as required by
13-27-228, the secretary of state shall immediately send a sample petition form as provided in 13-27-233 to the
person submitting the proposed constitutional initiative."

Section 5. Section 13-27-219, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-27-219. Constitutional convention initiative process and procedure. (1) A proponent of a
constitutional convention initiative shall submit the text of the proposed constitutional convention initiative to the
secretary of state together with draft ballot statements and the filing fee required by 13-27-215. The secretary of
state shall, without undue delay, forward a copy of the text of the proposed constitutional convention initiative
and ballot statements to the legislative services division for review in accordance with 13-27-225.
(2) (a) Within 14 days after receiving the proposed constitutional convention initiative from the
secretary of state, the legislative services division shall respond in writing to the proponent in accordance with
13-27-225.
(b) During the 14-day review period by the legislative services division, the secretary of state shall
hold a public hearing in accordance with [section 1].
(3) After the proponent responds to the legislative services division as provided in 13-27-225, the
proponent shall submit the final text of the proposed constitutional convention initiative and ballot statements to
the secretary of state. However, if a response to the legislative services division is not required by the
proponent pursuant to 13-27-225, the proponent shall instead submit the final text of the proposed
constitutional convention initiative and ballot statements to the secretary of state after the proponent receives
the legislative services division's response.
(4) On receipt of the final text of the proposed constitutional convention initiative and the ballot
statements, the secretary of state shall reject the proposed constitutional convention initiative if the text or a
ballot statement contains material not submitted to the legislative services division that is a substantive change
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 780

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 780.1
not recommended by the legislative services division. Otherwise, the secretary of state shall, without undue
delay, refer a copy of the proposed constitutional convention initiative and ballot statements concurrently to the
budget director and to the attorney general.
(5) The budget director shall determine whether a fiscal note is necessary, prepare the fiscal note,
notify the attorney general of the necessity of the fiscal note, and provide a copy of the fiscal note pursuant to
13-27-227 within 10 days. Receipt of the notice from the budget director begins the time frame timeframe in
subsection (6) and the attorney general's review in accordance with 13-27-226.
(6) Within 30 days of receipt of the fiscal note determination from the budget director, the attorney
general shall complete the requirements set forth in 13-27-226.
(7) The secretary of state shall review the legal sufficiency opinion received pursuant to 13-27-226.
If the attorney general:
(a) finds that the proposed constitutional convention initiative is not legally sufficient, the secretary
of state shall, without undue delay, send written notice to the person who submitted the proposal that the
proposed constitutional convention initiative has been rejected. The notice must include a copy of the attorney
general's legal sufficiency opinion.
(b) finds that the proposed constitutional convention initiative is legally sufficient, the secretary of
state shall, without undue delay, provide the executive director of the legislative services division a copy of the
final text of the proposed constitutional convention initiative and ballot statements in accordance with 13-27-
228. After the executive director of the legislative services division provides the secretary of state the outcome
of the vote as required by 13-27-228, the secretary of state shall immediately send a sample petition form as
provided in 13-27-233 to the person submitting the proposed constitutional convention initiative."

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 13, chapter 27, part 2, and the provisions of Title 13, chapter 27, part 2, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 780